Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on  ex-
penditures established by section 2, chapter  519, Oregon Laws 2019, as the maximum limit
for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Re-
ceipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Commission
for the Blind, is increased by $500,000 for the purchase  of vending machine equipment for the
commission’s Business Enterprise Program and for the case management migration  update
project.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on  ex-
penditures established by section 3, chapter  519, Oregon Laws 2019, as the maximum limit
for payment  of expenses from federal funds collected or received by the Commission for the
Blind, is increased  by $2,552,443 for the purchase of vending machine equipment for the
commission’s Business  Enterprise Program and for the case management migration update
project.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Health Authority by section  1 (1), chapter 695, Oregon Laws 2019, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for Health Systems,  Health Policy and Analytics, and
Public Health, is decreased by $217,493,490.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Health Authority by section  1 (2), chapter 695, Oregon Laws 2019, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for the Oregon State Hospital, is increased by $79,166,221.
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on  ex-
penditures established by section 3 (1), chapter 695, Oregon Laws 2019, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for  payment of expenses from lottery moneys
allocated from the Administrative Services Economic Development Fund to the Oregon
Health Authority, for Health Systems and Health Policy and Analytics,  is increased by
$576,000.
SECTION 6.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 3 (2), chapter 695, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from lottery moneys
allocated from the Administrative Services Economic Development Fund to the Oregon
Health Authority, for central services, state  assessments and enterprise-wide costs, is in-
creased by $235,528.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5723 (SB 5723-INTRO) Page 1
SECTION 7. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on  ex-
penditures established by section 2 (1), chapter 695, Oregon Laws 2019, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax  receipts, recreational
marijuana tax receipts, provider  taxes, Medicare receipts and federal funds for indirect cost
recovery, Supplemental Security Income recoveries, Women,  Infants and Children Program
food rebates, the Coordinated School Health Program, the  Edward Byrne Memorial State and
Local Law Enforcement Assistance Grant Program and emergency preparedness and re-
sponse services, but excluding lottery funds and federal  funds not described in section 2,
chapter 695, Oregon Laws 2019, collected or  received by the Oregon Health Authority, for
Health Systems, Health Policy and Analytics, and Public Health, is increased by $47,330,829.
SECTION 8.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (2), chapter 695, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax receipts, recreational
marijuana tax receipts, provider taxes, Medicare receipts and federal funds  for indirect cost
recovery, Supplemental Security Income recoveries,  Women, Infants and Children Program
food rebates, the Coordinated School Health Program, the  Edward Byrne Memorial State and
Local Law Enforcement Assistance Grant Program and emergency preparedness and re-
sponse services, but excluding lottery funds and  federal funds not described in section 2,
chapter 695, Oregon Laws 2019, collected or received by the  Oregon Health Authority, for the
Oregon State Hospital, is decreased by $31,179,017.
SECTION 9.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (3), chapter 695, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax receipts, recreational
marijuana tax receipts, provider taxes, Medicare receipts and federal funds  for indirect cost
recovery, Supplemental Security Income recoveries,  Women, Infants and Children Program
food rebates, the Coordinated School Health Program, the  Edward Byrne Memorial State and
Local Law Enforcement Assistance Grant Program and emergency preparedness and re-
sponse services, but excluding lottery funds and  federal funds not described in section 2,
chapter 695, Oregon Laws 2019, collected or received  by the Oregon Health Authority, for
central services, state assessments and enterprise-wide costs, is increased by $38,889.
SECTION 10.
Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (4), chapter 695, Oregon Laws 2019, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax  receipts, recreational
marijuana tax receipts, provider  taxes, Medicare receipts and federal funds for indirect cost
recovery, Supplemental Security Income recoveries, Women,  Infants and Children Program
food rebates, the Coordinated School Health Program, the  Edward Byrne Memorial State and
Local Law Enforcement Assistance Grant Program and emergency preparedness and re-
sponse services, but excluding lottery funds and federal  funds not described in section 2,
chapter 695, Oregon Laws 2019, collected or  received by the Oregon Health Authority, for
shared administrative services, is increased by $318,339.
SECTION 11.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 4 (1), chapter 695, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter 695,  Oregon Laws 2019, collected or
received by the Oregon Health Authority,  for Health Systems, Health Policy and Analytics,
and Public Health, is increased by $1,281,249,887.
SECTION 12. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 4 (2), chapter 695, Oregon Laws 2019, for  the biennium
Enrolled Senate Bill 5723 (SB 5723-INTRO) Page 2
ending June 30,  2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section  2, chapter 695, Oregon Laws 2019, collected or
received by the Oregon Health Authority, for the Oregon State  Hospital, is decreased by
$4,890,770.
SECTION 13. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 4 (3), chapter 695, Oregon Laws 2019, for  the biennium
ending June 30,  2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section  2, chapter 695, Oregon Laws 2019, collected or
received by the Oregon Health Authority, for central services, state assessments and
enterprise-wide costs, is decreased by $209,985.
SECTION 14.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 6,  chapter 695, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium ending
June 30, 2021, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses by the Public Employees’
Benefit Board from the Public Employees’ Revolving Fund for benefit plan premiums  and
self-insurance, is increased by $60,000,000.
SECTION 15. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 7,  chapter 695, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium ending
June 30, 2021, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses by the Oregon Educators
Benefit Board from the Oregon Educators Revolving Fund for benefit plan premiums  and
self-insurance, is increased by $62,000,000.
SECTION 16. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Justice by  section 1, chapter 608, Oregon Laws 2019, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2021, for the payment of expenses of district attorneys, is increased
by $500,000 for grand jury recordation services, a  statewide contract for transcription ser-
vice, statewide storage and archiving of grand jury recordings and transcripts  and technical
assistance support for recording equipment.
SECTION 17. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (1), chapter 692, Oregon Laws 2019, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or  received by the Department of Justice, for the Office of the Attorney
General and administration, is increased  by $435,000 for grand jury recordation services, a
statewide contract for transcription service  and the statewide storage and archiving of grand
jury recordings and transcripts.
SECTION 18. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (6), chapter 692, Oregon Laws 2019, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or received by  the Department of Justice, for the General Counsel Division,
is increased by $328,935 for the Business Transactions Section.
SECTION 19. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 3 (3), chapter 692, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as  the maximum limits for payment of expenses from federal funds
collected or received by the Department of Justice, for the Crime Victim and  Survivor Ser-
vices Division, is increased by $450,188 for Human Trafficking Intervention grants.
SECTION 20. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Justice by section 1 (2), chapter 692, Oregon Laws 2019, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2021, for the Appellate Division, is decreased by $28,590.
SECTION 21.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Justice by section 1 (3), chapter 692, Oregon Laws 2019, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2021, for the Criminal Justice Division, is decreased by $459,754.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5723 (SB 5723-INTRO) Page 3
SECTION 22. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Justice by section 1 (4), chapter 692, Oregon Laws 2019, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2021, for the Crime Victim and Survivor Services Division, is  de-
creased by $52,106.
SECTION 23.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Justice by section 1 (5), chapter 692, Oregon Laws 2019, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2021, for  Defense of Criminal Convictions, is decreased by
$2,281,591.
SECTION 24.
Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (2), chapter 692, Oregon Laws 2019, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or received by the Department of  Justice, for the Appellate Division, for the
defense of criminal convictions, is decreased by $328,554.
SECTION 25. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (7), chapter 692, Oregon Laws 2019, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or received by  the Department of Justice, for the Trial Division, for the de-
fense of criminal convictions, is decreased by $440,668.
SECTION 26. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Justice by section 1 (6), chapter 692, Oregon Laws 2019, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2021, for the Division of Child Support, is decreased by $56,902.
SECTION 27.
Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (8), chapter 692, Oregon Laws 2019, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or received  by the Department of Justice, for the Division of Child Support,
is decreased by $27,214.
SECTION 28. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 3 (4), chapter 692, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as  the maximum limits for payment of expenses from federal funds
collected or received by the Department of Justice, for the Division of Child Support,  is de-
creased by $163,285.
SECTION 29. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Justice by section 1 (7), chapter 692, Oregon Laws 2019, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2021, for  the Child Support Enforcement Automated System, is
decreased by $181,657.
SECTION 30.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (9), chapter 692, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by  the Department of Justice, for the Child Support Enforcement
Automated System, is increased by $534,285.
SECTION 31. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 3 (5), chapter 692, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as  the maximum limits for payment of expenses from federal funds
collected or received by the  Department of Justice, for the Child Support Enforcement Au-
tomated System, is decreased by $352,628.
SECTION 32.  This section intentionally left blank.
SECTION 33.  This section intentionally left blank.
SECTION 34.  This section intentionally left blank.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5723 (SB 5723-INTRO) Page 4
SECTION 35. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 3 (3), chapter 692, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as  the maximum limits for payment of expenses from federal funds
collected or received by the Department of Justice, for the Crime Victim and  Survivor Ser-
vices Division, is increased by $22,567,700 for supplemental funding for  existing federal
grants.
SECTION 36. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (9), chapter 692, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by  the Department of Justice, for the Child Support Enforcement
Automated System, is increased by $1,160,630 for contract payments.
SECTION 37. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 3 (5), chapter 692, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as  the maximum limits for payment of expenses from federal funds
collected or received by the  Department of Justice, for the Child Support Enforcement Au-
tomated System, is increased by $2,252,986 for contract payments.
SECTION 38. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 3 (3), chapter 568, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30,  2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds
collected or received by the Department  of State Police, for forensic services, is increased
by $1,104,843 for the expenditure of forensic services grant funds.
SECTION 39. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 3,  chapter 479, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium ending
June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of  expenses from federal funds collected
or received by the Department of Public Safety Standards and Training,  is increased by
$429,087 for expenditure of an Assistance to Firefighters  grant award on mobile firefighter
training equipment.
SECTION 40. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (1), chapter 303, Oregon Laws 2019, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or received by the Public Defense Services Commission,  for professional
services, is increased by $9,000,000 to  allow the commission to use federal funds received as
reimbursement for legal representation provided to children and parents in foster care legal
proceedings.
SECTION 41.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the  Public Defense Services Commission by section 1 (2), chapter 303, Oregon Laws
2019, for the biennium ending June  30, 2021, for professional services, is decreased by
$4,500,000.
SECTION 42. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 37, chapter 644, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium ending
June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from lottery moneys  allocated
from the Administrative Services Economic Development Fund to the  Oregon Business De-
velopment Department for a tide gate and culvert repair and  replacement grant and loan
program, is increased by $2,999,999.
SECTION 43. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Business Development  Department by section 1 (1), chapter 522, Oregon
Laws 2019, for the biennium ending June 30,  2021, for the Oregon Arts Commission, is de-
creased by $332,938.
SECTION 44. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Business Development  Department by section 1 (2), chapter 522, Oregon
Enrolled Senate Bill 5723 (SB 5723-INTRO) Page 5
Laws 2019, for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for business, innovation and trade, is de-
creased by $292,298.
SECTION 45. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Business Development  Department by section 35, chapter 644, Oregon
Laws 2019, for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for deposit into the  University Innovation
Research Fund established by section 21, chapter  643, Oregon Laws 2019, is decreased by
$7,400,000.
SECTION 46. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the allocation made to  the
Oregon Business Development Department at the March 9, 2020, meeting  of the Emergency
Board (Item No. 4), for infrastructure, for deposit in the  Special Public Works Fund estab-
lished under ORS 285B.455, for reimbursement of loans made from the Special Public  Works
Fund to the City of Pendleton for levee repairs, is decreased by $153,000.
SECTION 47. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 3 (1), chapter 522, Oregon Laws 2019, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for  payment of expenses from lottery moneys
allocated from the Administrative Services Economic Development Fund to the Oregon
Business Development Department, for business, innovation and trade,  is decreased by
$7,300,934.
SECTION 48.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 3 (1), chapter 522, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from lottery moneys
allocated from the Administrative Services Economic Development Fund to the Oregon
Business Development Department, for  business, innovation and trade, is decreased by
$400,000 to reflect a decrease in amounts authorized for expenditure for the  Oregon Manu-
facturing Innovation Center by section 46, chapter 644, Oregon Laws 2019.
SECTION 49.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 3 (2), chapter 522, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from lottery moneys
allocated from the Administrative Services Economic Development Fund to the Oregon
Business Development Department, for operations, is decreased by $555,548.
SECTION 50.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 3 (3), chapter 522, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from lottery moneys
allocated from the Administrative Services Economic Development Fund to the Oregon
Business Development  Department, for the Oregon Film and Video Office, is decreased by
$106,250.
SECTION 51.
Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 3 (5), chapter 522, Oregon Laws 2019, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for  payment of expenses from lottery moneys
allocated from the Administrative Services Economic Development Fund to the Oregon
Business Development Department, for infrastructure, is decreased  by $1,600,000 to reflect
a decrease in amounts authorized for expenditure for redevelopment of the Port of Port
Orford Cannery by section 38 (3), chapter 644, Oregon Laws 2019.
SECTION 52.
Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 39 (1), chapter 644, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for  payment of expenses from lottery moneys
allocated from the Administrative Services Economic Development Fund to the Oregon
Business Development Department, for Arts and  Cultural Trust, for a grant to Cottage
Theatre for ACT III Theatre Expansion, is decreased by $56,250.
SECTION 53.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 39 (2), chapter 644, Oregon Laws 2019, for the  biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from lottery moneys
Enrolled Senate Bill 5723 (SB 5723-INTRO) Page 6
allocated from the Administrative Services Economic Development Fund to the Oregon
Business Development Department, for Arts and Cultural  Trust, for a grant to High Desert
Museum for the By Hand Through Memory  Exhibit Renovation and Art of the American
West Gallery, is decreased by $37,500.
SECTION 54.
Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 39 (3), chapter 644, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for  payment of expenses from lottery moneys
allocated from the Administrative Services Economic Development Fund to the Oregon
Business Development Department, for Arts and Cultural Trust, for a grant to  Liberty
Theatre for Stage House and Facilities Improvements, is decreased by $150,000.
SECTION 55.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 39 (4), chapter 644, Oregon Laws 2019, for the  biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from lottery moneys
allocated from the Administrative Services Economic Development Fund to the Oregon
Business Development Department, for Arts and Cultural  Trust, for a grant to the Oregon
Nikkei Endowment for Oregon Nikkei Legacy Center Renovations, is decreased by $75,000.
SECTION 56.
Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 4 (1), chapter 522, Oregon Laws 2019, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds
collected or received by the Oregon Business Development Department, for business, inno-
vation and trade, is increased by $11,000,000.
SECTION 57.
Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 4 (2), chapter 522, Oregon Laws 2019, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds
collected or received by the Oregon Business Development Department,  for infrastructure,
is increased by $18,378,268.
SECTION 58. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 4, chapter 269, Oregon Laws 2019,  for the biennium ending
June 30,  2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds other than
those described in section 2, chapter 269, Oregon Laws 2019,  collected or received by the
Employment Department, is increased by $1,140,563 for  administration of 1B Workforce In-
vestment Opportunity Act Adult and Dislocated Worker programs provided under contract.
SECTION 59. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 1 (2), chapter 269, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts and moneys appropriated to the Employ-
ment Department by sections  2 and 3, chapter 269, Oregon Laws 2019, but excluding lottery
funds and federal funds  other than those described in section 2, chapter 269, Oregon Laws
2019, collected or received by the Employment  Department, for the Office of Administrative
Hearings, is increased by $437,440 for additional caseload.
SECTION 60. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$26,300,000 is established for the biennium ending  June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from federal funds  collected or received by the Employment Depart-
ment for administration of  the Pandemic Unemployment Assistance program for adminis-
tration of benefits to eligible claimants.
SECTION 61. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 4, chapter 269, Oregon Laws 2019,  for the biennium ending
June 30,  2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds other than
those described in section 2, chapter 269, Oregon Laws 2019,  collected or received by the
Employment Department, is increased by  $61,016,673 for administration of unemployment
insurance benefits.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5723 (SB 5723-INTRO) Page 7
SECTION 62. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Employment Department by  section 59, chapter 700, Oregon Laws 2019, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2021, is decreased by $6,180,000.
SECTION 63. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2, chapter 642, Oregon Laws 2019,  for the biennium ending
June 30, 2021,  as the maximum limit for payment of expenses for operations, from fees,
moneys or other  revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds from the
United States  Department of Housing and Urban Development for contract services, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 642, Oregon  Laws
2019, collected or received by the Housing and Community Services Department, is increased
by $270,022 for management occupancy reviews conducted by the department.
SECTION 64. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$7,500,000 is established for the  biennium ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts
and federal funds from the United States Department  of Housing and Urban Development for
contract services, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  this section,
collected or received by the Housing  and Community Services Department, for affordable
housing, rapid rehousing  and rental assistance and infrastructure replacement in Umatilla
County, including the Umatilla Indian reservation.
SECTION 65.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$56,170,636 is established for the biennium ending  June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from federal funds received by the Housing and Community Services
Department from the United States Department of Health and Human Services for the
Emergency Solutions Grant program authorized by  the Coronavirus Aid, Relief and Eco-
nomic Security (CARES) Act of 2020 to supplement funding for  housing stability efforts for
eligible Oregonians.
SECTION 66.
 This section intentionally left blank.
SECTION 67. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$7,972,444 is established for the  biennium ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from federal funds received by the Housing and Community Services
Department from the United States Department of Health and Human Services for the
Community Services Block Grant program authorized by the Coronavirus  Aid, Relief and
Economic Security Act of 2020  to address the consequences of increasing unemployment and
economic disruption as a result of COVID-19.
SECTION 68.
Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$9,513,504 is established for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, as  the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from federal funds received by the Housing and Community Services
Department from the United States Department of  Health and Human Services for the Low
Income Home Energy Assistance Program authorized by the Coronavirus Aid, Relief and
Economic Security Act of  2020, for energy assistance to low-income households under the
Low Income Home Energy Assistance Program.
SECTION 69.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 1 (1), chapter 694, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by  the Oregon Liquor Control Commission, for administrative
expenses, is decreased by $1,770,000.
SECTION 70. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of  $20,000
is established for the biennium ending June 30,  2021, as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by  the Department of Veterans’
Affairs, for debt service.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5723 (SB 5723-INTRO) Page 8
SECTION 71. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$1,706,284 is established for the for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit
for payment of expenses from federal funds collected or received  by the Department of
Veterans’ Affairs, for CARES Act  Provider Relief Fund payments to the Oregon Veterans’
Homes.
SECTION 72. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 5 (5), chapter 607, Oregon Laws 2019, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds
collected or received by the Department of Consumer and Business  Services, for the Division
of Financial Regulation, is increased by $445,176 for the  expenditure of federal grant funds
for the planning and implementation of select federal insurance  market reforms and con-
sumer protections.
SECTION 73. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 1 (2), chapter 607, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by the Department of Consumer and Business Services, for  the
Workers’ Compensation Division, is increased by $17,520  for position adjustments and re-
classifications.
SECTION 74. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 1 (4), chapter 607, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by the Department of Consumer and Business Services, for  the
Central Services Division, is increased  by $50,928 for position adjustments and reclassifica-
tions.
SECTION 75. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 1 (5), chapter 607, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by the Department of Consumer and Business Services, for  the
Division of Financial Regulation, is increased by $367,644 for position  adjustments and re-
classifications.
SECTION 76. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Bureau of Labor and Industries by section 1, chapter 633, Oregon Laws 2019, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2021, is decreased by $1,046,866.
SECTION 77.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 3 (1), chapter 633, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum  limit for payment of administrative expenses by the
Bureau of Labor and Industries from the Wage Security Fund, is increased by $87,815.
SECTION 78. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 1, chapter 23,  Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium ending
June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees,  moneys or other
revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds,
collected or received by the Oregon Board of Licensed  Professional Counselors and Thera-
pists, is increased by $314,793 to reflect  position establishment and reclassification, an in-
crease in facilities rent and cost reallocation between the Oregon Board  of Licensed
Professional Counselors and Therapists and the Oregon Board of Psychology.
SECTION 79.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2, chapter 23, Oregon  Laws 2019, for the biennium ending
June 30, 2021, as  the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or other
revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds,
Enrolled Senate Bill 5723 (SB 5723-INTRO) Page 9
collected or received by the Oregon Board of Psychology, is decreased by $158,430 to reflect
position establishment and reclassification, an increase in facilities rent, and cost reallo-
cation between the Oregon Board of Licensed Professional Counselors and Therapists and the
Oregon Board of Psychology.
SECTION 80.
Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 1, chapter 22,  Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium ending
June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees,  moneys or other
revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds,
collected or received by the State  Board of Licensed Social Workers, is increased by $203,661
for activities related to compliance case closure.
SECTION 81.
Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (3), chapter 452, Oregon Laws 2019, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, and  including federal funds for contract
services, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 452,
Oregon Laws 2019, collected or received by the State  Department of Agriculture, for natural
resources, is increased by $1,139,000 to address increasing workload around the hemp  pro-
gram.
SECTION 82.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 4,  chapter 698, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium ending
June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of  expenses from federal funds collected
or received by the State Department of Energy, is  increased by $1,075,258 to expend grant
funds related to the siting of potential renewable energy development projects.
SECTION 83. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the State Forestry Department by section 1 (2), chapter 664, Oregon Laws  2019, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for fire safety, is increased by  $10,383,896 for the payment
of emergency firefighting costs and  interest expenses associated with the 2019 forest fire
season.
SECTION 84. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the State Forestry Department by section 1 (1), chapter 664, Oregon Laws  2019, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for  agency administration, is increased by $700,000 for
payment of contracted consulting services.
SECTION 85. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Land Use Board of Appeals by section  1, chapter 219, Oregon Laws 2019, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2021, is increased by $59,980 for the migration of contracted  ad-
ministrative functions to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services.
SECTION 86. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of  $86,953
is established for the biennium ending June 30,  2021, as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses by the Department  of State Lands from the Submerged Lands Enhancement Fund
established under ORS 274.388.
SECTION 87. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 1 (1), chapter 454, Oregon Laws 2019, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds, federal  funds
and funds described in section 2, chapter  454, Oregon Laws 2019, collected or received by the
Department of State Lands, for Common School Fund programs, is decreased by $86,953.
SECTION 88. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 3 (2), chapter 454, Oregon Laws 2019, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds
collected or  received by the Department of State Lands, for Common School Fund programs,
is increased by $478,286 for the  expenditure of federal grant funding for ongoing wetlands
program development, state assistance and preliminary program  development for the even-
Enrolled Senate Bill 5723 (SB 5723-INTRO) Page 10
tual assumption of permitting authority under section 404 of the federal Clean Water  Act (33
U.S.C. 1344).
SECTION 89. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 1 (1), chapter 454, Oregon Laws 2019, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds, federal  funds
and funds described in section 2, chapter  454, Oregon Laws 2019, collected or received by the
Department of State Lands, for Common School Fund programs, is increased by  $186,592 for
the costs associated with the establishment  of a natural resources specialist position for the
enforcement of abandoned and derelict vessel and  camping regulations on state-owned
waterways.
SECTION 90. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 1 (1), chapter 454, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds, federal funds
and funds described in section 2, chapter  454, Oregon Laws 2019, collected or received by the
Department of State Lands, for Common School Fund programs, is increased by $58,992  for
the reclassification of positions.
SECTION 91. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 4 (3), chapter 302, Oregon Laws 2019, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds
collected or received by the State Parks and Recreation Department, for community support
and grants, is increased by $665,000  for the expenditure of federal grant funds for historic
revitalization.
SECTION 92. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 4 (4), chapter 535, Oregon Laws 2019, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds other
than those described in section 3, chapter  535, Oregon Laws 2019, collected or received by the
Water  Resources  Department, for technical services, is increased by $260,484 for the ex-
penditure of federal grant funds for work on the rehabilitation of high hazard potential dams.
SECTION 93.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Water  Resources Department, by section 1 (1), chapter 535, Oregon Laws 2019,
for the biennium ending  June 30, 2021, for administrative services, is increased by $125,000
for the costs associated with  the migration of information technology hardware and services
to the state data center.
SECTION 94. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$500,000 is established for the biennium ending June 30,  2021, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the Department of Transportation from lottery  moneys allocated
from the Veterans’ Services Fund established under  ORS 406.140 to the Department of
Veterans’ Affairs and transferred to the Department of Transportation for  veteran transit
services.
SECTION 95. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$4,000,000 is established for the  biennium ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses  from federal funds other than those described in section 2, chapter 614,
Oregon Laws 2019, collected or received by the Department  of Transportation, for motor
carrier transportation.
SECTION 96. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (9), chapter 614, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received as reimburse-
ment from the United States Department of Transportation, but  excluding lottery funds and
federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 614, Oregon Laws 2019, collected or received
Enrolled Senate Bill 5723 (SB 5723-INTRO) Page 11
by the Department of Transportation, for driver and  motor vehicle services, is increased by
$6,131,433 for costs associated with changes in licensing laws.
SECTION 97. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 3 (3), chapter 614, Oregon Laws 2019, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds other
than those described in section 2, chapter  614, Oregon Laws 2019, collected or received by the
Department of Transportation, for public  transit, is increased by $42,700,000 for the purpose
of distributing federal CARES Act funds for public transportation.
SECTION 98.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services by section  115 (13), chapter 644,
Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for Lutheran Community  Services
Northwest for drug abuse programs, is decreased by $500,000.
SECTION 99. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Department  of Administrative Services by section 115 (16), chapter 644,
Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium ending  June 30, 2021, for the Historic Portland Public
Market Foundation for the James Beard Public Market, is decreased by $400,000.
SECTION 100. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services  by section 115 (21), chapter
644, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for Klamath County to acquire,
install, and maintain stream gauges, is decreased by $30,000.
SECTION 101.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (1), chapter  518, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received from charges,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section 2, chapter 518, Oregon
Laws 2019, collected or received by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for
the Chief Operating Office, is decreased by $785,827.
SECTION 102.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (2), chapter 518,  Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received from charges,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section 2, chapter 518, Oregon
Laws 2019, collected or received by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,  for
the Chief Financial Office, is decreased by $60,000.
SECTION 103.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (3), chapter  518, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received from charges,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section 2, chapter 518, Oregon
Laws 2019, collected or received by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for
the Office of the State Chief Information Officer, for policy, is decreased by $6,424,308.
SECTION 104.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (4), chapter 518,  Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received from charges,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section 2, chapter 518, Oregon
Laws 2019, collected or received by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,  for
the Chief Human Resources Office, is decreased by $577,355.
SECTION 105.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (5)(a), chapter 518, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received from charges,
Enrolled Senate Bill 5723 (SB 5723-INTRO) Page 12
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section 2, chapter 518, Oregon
Laws 2019, collected or received by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,  for
the Office of the State Chief  Information Officer for State Data Center operations, is de-
creased by $8,220,895.
SECTION 106. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (6), chapter 518,  Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received from charges,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section 2, chapter 518, Oregon
Laws 2019, collected or received by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,  for
Enterprise Asset Management, is decreased by $5,165,449.
SECTION 107.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (7), chapter  518, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received from charges,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section 2, chapter 518, Oregon
Laws 2019, collected or received by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for
Enterprise Goods and Services, is decreased by $2,659,975.
SECTION 108.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (8), chapter 518,  Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received from charges,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section 2, chapter 518, Oregon
Laws 2019, collected or received by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,  for
Business Services, is decreased by $2,277,000.
SECTION 109.
In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for the biennium ending  June
30, 2021, out of the General Fund, the amount of $2,000,000 for the Curry Health District  for
the Brookings Emergency Room.
SECTION 110. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 116 (12), chapter 644, Oregon Laws 2019,  for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses  from lottery bond pro-
ceeds collected or received  by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for pay-
ments to the Curry  Health District for the Brookings Emergency Room, is decreased by
$2,042,875.
SECTION 111. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 117 (1), chapter 644, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit  for payment of expenses from proceeds of bonds
issued under Article XI-Q of the Oregon  Constitution, collected or received by the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, for Oregon State Fair capital  improvements, is de-
creased by $5,325,925.
SECTION 112.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 117 (2), chapter 644, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit  for payment of expenses from proceeds of bonds
issued under Article XI-Q of the Oregon Constitution,  collected or received by the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, for the  Oregon State Fair Horse Barn, is decreased
by $3,000,000.
SECTION 113.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 117 (3), chapter 644, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit  for payment of expenses from proceeds of bonds
issued under Article XI-Q of the Oregon  Constitution, collected or received by the Oregon
Enrolled Senate Bill 5723 (SB 5723-INTRO) Page 13
Department of Administrative Services, for the  Oregon State Fair Poultry Barn, is decreased
by $2,000,000.
SECTION 114. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (6), chapter 518,  Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received from charges,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section 2, chapter 518, Oregon
Laws 2019, collected or received by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,  for
Enterprise Asset Management, is increased  by $2,300,000 for infrastructure capital improve-
ments at the Mill Creek Corporate Center.
SECTION 115.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (6), chapter 518,  Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received from charges,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section 2, chapter 518, Oregon
Laws 2019, collected or received by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,  for
Enterprise Asset Management, is increased  by $2,500,000 for infrastructure capital improve-
ments at the North Campus property.
SECTION 116.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (7), chapter 518,  Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received from charges,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section 2, chapter 518, Oregon
Laws 2019, collected or received by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,  for
Enterprise Goods and Services, is increased by $53,660 to provide payroll services  for the
Department of Revenue.
SECTION 117.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (7), chapter 518,  Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received from charges,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section 2, chapter 518, Oregon
Laws 2019, collected or received by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,  for
Enterprise Goods and Services, is increased by $4,912,709 for  the Workday Payroll and Time
Tracking Project.
SECTION 118.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (14), chapter 518, Oregon Laws 2019,  for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received from charges,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section 2, chapter 518, Oregon
Laws 2019, collected or received by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,  for
Oregon Department of Administrative Services information  technology, is increased by
$788,835 for the Workday Payroll and Time Tracking Project.
SECTION 119.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (3), chapter 518,  Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received from charges,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section 2, chapter 518, Oregon
Laws 2019, collected or received by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,  for
the Office of the State Chief Information Officer for policy, is increased by $8,790,404  for in-
formation technology management and security improvements.
SECTION 120.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (5)(a), chapter 518, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
Enrolled Senate Bill 5723 (SB 5723-INTRO) Page 14
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received from charges,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section 2, chapter 518, Oregon
Laws 2019, collected or received by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,  for
the Office of the State Chief  Information Officer for State Data Center operations, is de-
creased by $8,790,404.
SECTION 121.
 This section intentionally left blank.
SECTION 122. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by the Emergency Board on  April 23, 2020 (Item No. 8), as the
maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds collected or received by the
Oregon Department of Administrative Services from the federal Coronavirus  Relief Fund, is
increased by $21,850,000.
SECTION 123. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (6), chapter 612,  Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts  and reimbursements from federal service
agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter
612, Oregon Laws 2019, collected  or received by the Department of Revenue, for the Corpo-
rate Division, is increased by $11,536,915 for the implementation of the  corporate activities
tax established under chapter 122, Oregon Laws 2019.
SECTION 124.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$2,300,000 is established for the  biennium ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by  the Department of
Revenue, for the core systems replacement program, for the implementation  of the corpo-
rate activity tax established under chapter 122, Oregon Laws 2019.
SECTION 125. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of Revenue by section 3, chapter 220,  Oregon Laws 2019, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for the core systems replacement program and the im-
plementation of the corporate activity tax established under chapter 122,  Oregon Laws 2019,
is decreased by $1,165,000.
SECTION 126.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of  Revenue by section 1 (1), chapter 612, Oregon Laws 2019,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for administration, is decreased by $2,256,838.
SECTION 127. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of  Revenue by section 1 (2), chapter 612, Oregon Laws 2019,
for the biennium  ending June 30, 2021, for the Property Tax Division, is decreased by
$886,888.
SECTION 128. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of Revenue by section 1 (3),  chapter 612, Oregon Laws 2019,
for the biennium ending June 30,  2021, for the Personal Tax and Compliance Division, is de-
creased by $4,200,964.
SECTION 129. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of  Revenue by section 1 (4), chapter 612, Oregon Laws 2019,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for the Business Division, is decreased by $688,383.
SECTION 130. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of  Revenue by section 1 (5), chapter 612, Oregon Laws 2019,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for the Corporate Division, is decreased by $1.
SECTION 131. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of Revenue by section 2, chapter 220,  Oregon Laws 2019, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for the Corporate Division, is decreased by $2,789,361.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5723 (SB 5723-INTRO) Page 15
SECTION 132. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of  Revenue by section 1 (6), chapter 612, Oregon Laws 2019,
for the biennium  ending June 30, 2021, for the Information Technology Services Division, is
decreased by $335,369.
SECTION 133. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (1), chapter 612,  Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts  and reimbursements from federal service
agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter
612, Oregon Laws 2019, collected or received by the Department of Revenue, for adminis-
tration, is decreased by $600,907.
SECTION 134.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (3), chapter  612, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and  reimbursements from federal service
agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter
612, Oregon Laws 2019, collected or received by the Department of Revenue, for the  Personal
Tax and Compliance Division, is decreased by $97,524.
SECTION 135.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (4), chapter  612, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and  reimbursements from federal service
agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter
612, Oregon Laws 2019, collected or received by the Department of Revenue,  for the Business
Division, is decreased by $353,662.
SECTION 136.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (7), chapter  612, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and  reimbursements from federal service
agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter
612, Oregon Laws 2019, collected or received by the Department of Revenue, for  the Infor-
mation Technology Services Division, is decreased by $56,832.
SECTION 137.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Employment Relations Board by section  1, chapter 39, Oregon Laws 2019,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, is decreased by $227,729.
SECTION 138. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2, chapter 39, Oregon Laws 2019, for the  biennium ending
June 30, 2021, as  the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or other
revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds and
funds described in section 3, chapter 39,  Oregon Laws 2019, collected or received by the
Employment Relations Board, is increased by $157,993.
SECTION 139. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 3, chapter 39, Oregon Laws 2019, for the  biennium ending
June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit  for payment of expenses from moneys received from the
assessment against state agencies described  in ORS 240.167 and transferred to the Employ-
ment Relations Board Administrative Account, is increased by $69,736.
SECTION 140. This section intentionally left blank.
SECTION 141. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Secretary of  State by section 1 (1), chapter 672, Oregon Laws 2019, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2021, for the Administrative  Services Division, is decreased by
$61,378.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5723 (SB 5723-INTRO) Page 16
SECTION 142. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Secretary of  State by section 1 (2), chapter 672, Oregon Laws 2019, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2021, for the Elections Division, is decreased by $249,704.
SECTION 143. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (1), chapter 672,  Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or received by the Secretary of State, for the  Administrative Services Divi-
sion, is decreased by $583,292.
SECTION 144. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (3), chapter  672, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by the Secretary of State, for  the Audits Division, is decreased
by $768,365.
SECTION 145. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (4), chapter 672,  Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or received by the Secretary of State, for the Archives  Division, is decreased
by $153,504.
SECTION 146. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (5), chapter 672,  Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or received by the Secretary of State, for the Corporation Division, is  de-
creased by $263,037.
SECTION 147. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Office  of the Governor by section 1, chapter 665, Oregon Laws 2019, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2021, is decreased by $812,327.
SECTION 148. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 3, chapter  611, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium end-
ing June 30,  2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses by the Public Employees
Retirement System from the School Districts Unfunded Liability Fund, is decreased by
$11,539,471.
SECTION 149.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Public Employees  Retirement Board by section 58, chapter 355, Oregon
Laws 2019, for the biennium ending June 30,  2021, for deposit in the Employer Incentive Fund
established under section 1, chapter 105, Oregon Laws 2018, is decreased by $35,248,198.
SECTION 150. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2, chapter  611, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium end-
ing June 30,  2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses by the Public Employees
Retirement System from the Employer Incentive Fund, is decreased by $1.
SECTION 151. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 4 (3), chapter 611,  Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or received by the Public Employees Retirement  System, Core Retirement
System Applications program, for information technology  applications, is decreased by
$10,000,000.
SECTION 152. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 4 (5), chapter 611,  Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
Enrolled Senate Bill 5723 (SB 5723-INTRO) Page 17
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or received by the Public Employees Retirement  System, Core Retirement
System Applications program, for contingency reserve, is decreased by $500,000.
SECTION 153. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the State Library by section 1, chapter  40, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, is decreased by $209,410.
SECTION 154. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Advocacy Commissions Office by section 1,  chapter 418, Oregon
Laws 2019, for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, is decreased by $77,104.
SECTION 155. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 4, chapter  693, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium end-
ing June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees,  moneys or other
revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds,
collected or received by the Legislative Administration Committee,  for expenses related to
the Oregon Capitol History Gateway  from the Oregon Capitol History Gateway Fund, is in-
creased by $600,000.
SECTION 156.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Legislative Administration Committee by section 1 (2), chapter 693, Oregon
Laws 2019, for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for debt service, is increased by $266,778.
SECTION 157. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (1), chapter  693, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by the Legislative Administration Committee,  for the general
program, is increased by $910,000 for costs of bond issuance.
SECTION 158. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Legislative Administration Committee by section 1 (1), chapter 693, Oregon
Laws 2019, for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for the  general program, is decreased by
$3,100,000.
SECTION 159. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Emergency Board by section 75 (1), chapter 644, Oregon  Laws 2019, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2021, for allocation for the  implementation of grand jury recording
and chapter 650, Oregon Laws 2017, is decreased by $3,000,000.
SECTION 160. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Emergency Board by section 5 (1), chapter 668, Oregon  Laws 2019, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2021, for allocation to the Department of Human Services to sup-
port implementation of the federal  Family First Prevention Services Act by increasing ca-
pacity to provide in-home and evidence-based services, is decreased by $4,000,000.
SECTION 161. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Emergency Board by section 3, chapter 531, Oregon  Laws 2019, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2021, for allocation to the State Department of Fish and Wildlife
for purposes of the Oregon Conservation and Recreation Fund, is decreased by $1,000,000.
SECTION 162. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Emergency Board by section 4 (1), chapter 644, Oregon  Laws 2019, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2021, for allocation to the Public Defense Services Commission for
caseload activities, including activities designed to  improve indigent defense caseloads and
to implement an improved public defense contract model, is decreased by $16,124,035.
SECTION 163. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Emergency Board by section 3 (1), chapter 303, Oregon  Laws 2019, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2021, for allocation to the Public Defense Services Commission  for
acquisition of a new financial management system, is decreased by $2,000,000.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5723 (SB 5723-INTRO) Page 18
SECTION 164. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to  the Emergency Board by section 121 (1), chapter 644, Oregon Laws 2019, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for allocation to the  Public Defense Services Commission
or Department of  Corrections for costs related to chapter 530, Oregon Laws 2019, related to
unauthorized use of vehicles, is decreased by $1,000,000.
SECTION 165. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Emergency Board by section 76 (1), chapter 644, Oregon  Laws 2019, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2021, for allocation to the Oregon Health Authority for the support
of interdisciplinary assessment teams consistent with  the requirements of chapter 616,
Oregon Laws 2019, is decreased by $5,700,000.
SECTION 166.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 7 (8), chapter 220,  Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for  payments of grant-in-aid, program costs and
purchased services by the Department of Education  from the Statewide Education Initiatives
Account established in ORS 327.250,  for early warning system grants, is decreased by
$216,820.
SECTION 167. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 8 (2), chapter  220, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses  by the Department of
Education from the Statewide Education Initiatives Account established in ORS 327.250, for
operations, is decreased by $6,006,451.
SECTION 168.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 8 (1), chapter  220, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses  by the Department of
Education from the Statewide Education Initiatives Account established in ORS 327.250, for
professional development and training for educators, is decreased by $276,729.
SECTION 169.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 6 (1), chapter  220, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses  by the Department of
Education from the Early Learning Account established by section 51, chapter 122,  Oregon
Laws 2019, for  professional development for early learning professionals, is decreased by
$260,985.
SECTION 170. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 6 (2), chapter 220,  Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as  the maximum limit for payment of expenses by the Department of
Education from  the Early Learning Account established by section 51, chapter 122, Oregon
Laws 2019, for operations, is decreased by $235,689.
SECTION 171. For the biennium ending June 30, 2021, expenditures by the Higher Edu-
cation Coordinating Commission from proceeds of state bonds issued  during the period be-
ginning July 1, 2013, and ending June 30, 2015, for the benefit of a public  university, pursuant
to agreements between the commission and a public university, are not limited.
SECTION 172. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 7 (1), chapter 666,  Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30,  2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section 10, chapter 666,  Oregon Laws 2019, collected or
received by the Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for operations, is  increased by
$146,436 for staffing changes.
SECTION 173. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Long Term  Care Ombudsman by section 1 (1), chapter 521, Oregon Laws
2019, for the biennium ending  June 30, 2021, for the general program and services provided
to care facility residents, is decreased by $274,542.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5723 (SB 5723-INTRO) Page 19
SECTION 174. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Long Term Care Ombudsman by section 1  (2), chapter 521, Oregon Laws
2019, for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for the  public guardian and conservator pro-
gram, is decreased by $166,276.
SECTION 175. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2, chapter 521, Oregon Laws  2019, for the biennium end-
ing June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees,  moneys or other
revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, and including federal Older Americans Act  funds
received from the Department of Human Services, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds not described in section 2, chapter 521, Oregon Laws 2019,  collected or received by the
Long Term Care Ombudsman, is increased by $221,000, for  additional Older Americans Act
Title VII funding received under the federal CARES Act.
SECTION 176.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to  the State Board of Parole and Post-Prison Supervision by section 1, chapter
523, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, is decreased by $326,590.
SECTION 177. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made  to the State Forestry Department by section 1 (1), chapter 664, Oregon Laws
2019, for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for agency administration,  is decreased by
$358,925.
SECTION 178. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the State Forestry Department by section 1 (2), chapter 664, Oregon  Laws
2019, for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for fire protection, is decreased by $2,840,363.
SECTION 179. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the State Forestry Department by section 1 (3), chapter 664, Oregon  Laws
2019, for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for private forests, is decreased by $1,385,040.
SECTION 180. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the State Forestry  Department by section 87, chapter 644, Oregon Laws 2019,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for the purchase of lands for addition to the  Santiam
State Forest, is decreased by $195,000.
SECTION 181. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (1), chapter  664, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limits  for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and including federal funds from the United
States Forest  Service for fire protection and for research projects, but excluding lottery
funds and federal funds not described  in section 2, chapter 664, Oregon Laws 2019, collected
or received by the State Forestry  Department, for agency administration, is decreased by
$1,148,103.
SECTION 182. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (2), chapter  664, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limits  for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and including federal funds from the United
States Forest  Service for fire protection and for research projects, but excluding lottery
funds and federal funds not described  in section 2, chapter 664, Oregon Laws 2019, collected
or received by the State Forestry Department, for fire protection, is decreased by $971,548.
SECTION 183. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (4), chapter 664,  Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limits for  payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and including federal funds from the United
States Forest Service for fire protection and for research projects, but excluding  lottery
funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter  664, Oregon Laws 2019, collected
or received by the State Forestry Department, for private forests, is decreased by $672,474.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5723 (SB 5723-INTRO) Page 20
SECTION 184. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (7), chapter  664, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limits  for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and including federal funds from the United
States Forest  Service for fire protection and for research projects, but excluding lottery
funds and federal funds not described  in section 2, chapter 664, Oregon Laws 2019, collected
or received by the State Forestry Department, for the equipment pool, is  decreased by
$146,000.
SECTION 185. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 4 (4), chapter  664, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as  the maximum limits for payment of expenses from federal funds
other than those described in section  2, chapter 664, Oregon Laws 2019, collected or received
by the State Forestry Department, for private forests, is decreased by $57,844.
SECTION 186. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of  Land Conservation and Development by section 1 (1),
chapter 669, Oregon Laws 2019, for the  biennium ending June 30, 2021, for the planning pro-
gram, is decreased by $965,643.
SECTION 187. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of Land Conservation and  Development by section 1 (2),
chapter 669, Oregon Laws 2019, for the  biennium ending June 30, 2021, for grant programs,
is decreased by $289,301.
SECTION 188. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of Land Conservation and Development by section 136, chapter
644, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for the  implementation of the
provisions of chapter 639, Oregon Laws  2019, and chapter 640, Oregon Laws 2019, is decreased
by $396,368.
SECTION 189.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of Land  Conservation and Development by section 2, chapter
654, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for the  implementation of the
provisions of section 1, chapter 654, Oregon Laws 2019, is decreased by $17,000.
SECTION 190. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Land Conservation and Development by section 15, chapter
639, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium ending June 30,  2021, for technical assistance grants
to local  governments for the implementation of the provisions of chapter 639, Oregon Laws
2019, is decreased by $1,115,000.
SECTION 191. This section intentionally left blank.
SECTION 192. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Land Conservation and Development by section 22, chapter
640, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for the  implementation of the
provisions of chapter 640, Oregon Laws 2019, is decreased by $115,000.
SECTION 193. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 3 (1), chapter 454,  Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds
collected or received by the Department of State Lands  for the expenditure of federal grant
funding for land acquisition and trail  improvements at the South Slough National Estuarine
Research Reserve, is increased by $210,000.
SECTION 194. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made  to the Water Resources Department by section 1 (1), chapter 535, Oregon Laws
2019, for the biennium ending June 30,  2021, for administrative services, is decreased by
$472,151.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5723 (SB 5723-INTRO) Page 21
SECTION 195. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Water Resources Department by section 1 (2), chapter 535, Oregon  Laws
2019, for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for field services, is decreased by $1,382,427.
SECTION 196. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Water Resources Department by section 1 (3), chapter 535, Oregon  Laws
2019, for the biennium ending  June 30, 2021, for water rights and adjudications, is decreased
by $333,305.
SECTION 197. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made  to the Water Resources Department by section 1 (4), chapter 535, Oregon Laws
2019, for  the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for technical services, is decreased by $1,030,287.
SECTION 198. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made  to the Water Resources Department by section 1 (5), chapter 535, Oregon Laws
2019, for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for the director’s office,  is decreased by $419,529.
SECTION 199. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 3 (2), chapter  535, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts  and including federal funds received under
cooperative agreements with or contracts from the Bureau  of Reclamation of the United
States Department of the Interior, the United States  Army Corps of Engineers, the United
States Geological Survey, the  Bonneville Power Administration and the National Fish and
Wildlife Foundation, but excluding lottery funds and  federal funds not described in section
3, chapter 535,  Oregon Laws 2019, collected or received by the Water Resources Department,
for field services, is increased by $552,262.
SECTION 200. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of Education by section  1, chapter 218, Oregon Laws 2019, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for the State School Fund, is decreased by $150,190,773.
SECTION 201. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2, chapter 218, Oregon Laws  2019, for the biennium end-
ing June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of  expenses from lottery moneys allo-
cated from the Administrative Services  Economic Development Fund to the Department of
Education, for the State School Fund, is decreased by $199,679,327.
SECTION 202. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 3, chapter 218, Oregon Laws  2019, for the biennium end-
ing June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit  for payment of expenses by the Department of Ed-
ucation from fees,  moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but
excluding lottery funds, federal  funds and funds described in section 4, chapter 218, Oregon
Laws 2019, collected or received by the  Department of Education, for the State School Fund,
is increased by $100.
SECTION 203. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of Education by section 1 (1), chapter 609, Oregon Laws  2019,
for the biennium ending June  30, 2021, for operations, is decreased by $7,824,537 for changes
in staffing and other costs.
SECTION 204. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 6 (2), chapter  609, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of  expenses, other than expenses
described in sections  7 and 10, chapter 609, Oregon Laws 2019, from fees, moneys or other
revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds,
collected or received by the Department of  Education, for operations, is increased by
$2,925,703 for changes in staffing and other costs.
SECTION 205.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 8 (1), chapter  609, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
Enrolled Senate Bill 5723 (SB 5723-INTRO) Page 22
other than those described in  sections 9 and 10, chapter 609, Oregon Laws 2019, collected or
received by the Department of  Education, for operations, is increased by $1,175,207 for
changes in staffing and other costs.
SECTION 206. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of Education by section 1 (2), chapter 609, Oregon Laws  2019,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2021,  for the Oregon School for the Deaf, is decreased by
$1,070,888 for changes in staffing and other costs.
SECTION 207. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 6 (3), chapter 609,  Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as  the maximum limit for payment of expenses, other than expenses
described in sections 7 and 10, chapter 609, Oregon Laws 2019, from fees, moneys  or other
revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds,
collected or  received by the Department of Education, for the Oregon School for the Deaf,
is increased by $308,132 for changes in staffing and other costs.
SECTION 208.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of Education by section  1, chapter 220, Oregon Laws 2019, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for developing  and implementing programs created under
chapter 122, Oregon Laws 2019, is decreased by $1,310,586.
SECTION 209. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 6 (1), chapter  666, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds and funds described  in sections 8 to 12, chapter 666, Oregon Laws 2019, collected or
received by the Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for operations, is  increased by
$2,148,323 for staffing and the costs of issuing general obligation bonds.
SECTION 210. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of Education by section 2 (2), chapter 609, Oregon Laws  2019,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for other special education  programs, is decreased by
$3,314,302 for the Long Term Care and Treatment program and Hospital programs.
SECTION 211. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 7 (4), chapter 609,  Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for  payment of grants-in-aid, program costs and
purchased services from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds  and federal funds, collected or received by the Department of
Education for  programs other than those specified in sections 6 and 10, chapter 609, Oregon
Laws 2019, for all other grants,  is increased by $3,314,302 for the Long Term Care and
Treatment program and Hospital programs.
SECTION 212.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of Education by section 2 (4), chapter 609, Oregon Laws  2019,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for other K-12 grant-in-aid programs, is decreased  by
$9,874,883 for reductions in a variety of programs.
SECTION 213. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of Education by section 2 (6), chapter 609, Oregon Laws  2019,
for the biennium ending June  30, 2021, for other early learning programs, is decreased by
$3,250,233 for reductions relating to the Healthy Families program,  Early Learning Hubs and
Child Care Focus Networks.
SECTION 214. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of Education by section 2 (7), chapter 609, Oregon Laws  2019,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for youth development programs, is decreased by
$129,453 for reductions to Community Schools and gang prevention programs.
SECTION 215.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to  the Early Learning Division by section 4, chapter 586, Oregon Laws 2019, for
Enrolled Senate Bill 5723 (SB 5723-INTRO) Page 23
the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for the Task Force  on Access to Quality Affordable Child
Care, is decreased by $20,084.
SECTION 216. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of Education by section  2, chapter 590, Oregon Laws 2019, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2021,  for the Farm-to-School Grant Program, is decreased by
$4,851,321.
SECTION 217. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of Education by section  3, chapter 609, Oregon Laws 2019, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for deposit in the  High School Graduation and College and
Career Readiness Fund, is decreased by $3,016,146.
SECTION 218. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 4, chapter  220, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium end-
ing June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit  for payments of grant-in-aid, program costs and
purchased services  by the Department of Education from the Student Investment Account
established by section 8, chapter 122, Oregon Laws 2019, is decreased by $322,740,000.
SECTION 219. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 7 (9), chapter  220, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for  payments of grant-in-aid, program costs and
purchased services by the Department of Education  from the Statewide Education Initiatives
Account established by section 24, chapter 122, Oregon Laws 2019, for student  success
grants, is decreased by $8,000,000.
SECTION 220. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 7 (7), chapter 220,  Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for  payments of grant-in-aid, program costs and
purchased services by the Department of Education  from the Statewide Education Initiatives
Account established by section 24, chapter 122, Oregon Laws 2019, for  grants to education
service districts for technical assistance, is decreased by $4,000,000.
SECTION 221. This section intentionally left blank.
SECTION 222. This section intentionally left blank.
SECTION 223. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to  the Higher Education Coordinating Commission by section 1 (1), chapter 666,
Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium  ending June 30, 2021, for Higher Education Coordinating
Commission operations, is decreased by $1,373,269 for staffing and other changes.
SECTION 224. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to  the Higher Education Coordinating Commission by section 1 (7), chapter 666,
Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for other student  assistance, is
decreased by $2,500,000 for the National Guard Tuition Assistance program.
SECTION 225. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission by section 1 (5),  chapter 666,
Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for  Oregon Opportunity Grants, is
decreased by $10,000,000 to account for additional Other Funds revenues for the program.
SECTION 226. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 6 (2), chapter 666,  Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds and funds described in sections 8 to 12, chapter 666, Oregon Laws  2019, collected or
received by the Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for other  programs, is increased
by $10,000,000 to account for additional Other Funds revenues for the programs.
SECTION 227. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to  the Higher Education Coordinating Commission by section 1 (6), chapter 666,
Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for  Oregon Promise grants, is de-
creased by $3,600,000.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5723 (SB 5723-INTRO) Page 24
SECTION 228. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission by section 1 (9),  chapter 666,
Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium ending  June 30, 2021, for public university statewide
programs, is decreased by $812,503.
SECTION 229. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission by section 1 (10), chapter  666,
Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium ending June 30, 2021,  for the Agricultural Experiment
Station and the branch extension  stations of Oregon State University, is decreased by
$1,904,597.
SECTION 230. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission by section 1 (11), chapter  666,
Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium ending  June 30, 2021, for the Oregon State University
Extension Service, is decreased by $1,400,060.
SECTION 231. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission by section 1 (12), chapter  666,
Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for the  Forest Research Labora-
tory at Oregon State University, is decreased by $285,601.
SECTION 232. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 5, chapter  666, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium end-
ing June 30, 2021, as the  maximum limit for payment of expenses from lottery moneys allo-
cated from the Administrative Services  Economic Development Fund to the Higher
Education Coordinating Commission for the Outdoor School Education Fund, is decreased
by $2,265,292.
SECTION 233.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission by section 16 (3), chapter  699,
Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium ending  June 30, 2021, for distribution to the College of
Agricultural Sciences of Oregon State University to conduct the study required under section
10, chapter 699, Oregon Laws 2019, is decreased by $11,979.
SECTION 234.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission by section 1 (8),  chapter 666,
Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for Oregon Health  and Science
University education and other programs, is decreased by $338,042.
SECTION 235. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Psychiatric Security Review Board by section 1, chapter 524, Oregon Laws
2019, for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, is decreased by $100,000.
SECTION 236. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (2), chapter 522,  Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or  received by the Oregon Business Development Department, for
infrastructure, is decreased by $15,052,365, for lottery revenue  bond proceeds and costs of
bond issuance.
SECTION 237. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to  the Oregon Business Development Department, for the biennium ending June 30,
2021, out of the  General Fund, for infrastructure, the amount of $7,000,000 for a grant to the
City of Sweet Home for a wastewater treatment plant upgrade.
SECTION 238. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to  the Oregon Business Development Department, for the biennium ending June 30,
2021, out of the  General Fund, for infrastructure, the amount of $4,220,000 for a grant to the
Confederated Tribes of the Warm Springs for  water system upgrades and a wastewater
treatment plant upgrade.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5723 (SB 5723-INTRO) Page 25
SECTION 239. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2, chapter  642, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium end-
ing June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees,  moneys or other
revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds from the United States  De-
partment of Housing and Urban Development for contract  services, but excluding lottery
funds and federal funds not described  in section 2, chapter 642, Oregon Laws 2019, collected
or received by the Housing and  Community Services Department, for operations, is increased
by $315,000 for costs of issuance of bonds for the development of affordable housing  for low
income households issued under the authority of Article XI-Q of the Oregon Constitution  for
the Local Innovation and Fast Track Housing Program.
SECTION 240. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the limitation of
expenditures established by section 2, chapter  642, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium end-
ing June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees,  moneys or other
revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds from the United States  De-
partment of Housing and Urban Development for contract  services, but excluding lottery
funds and federal funds not described  in section 2, chapter 642, Oregon Laws 2019, collected
or received by the Housing and  Community Services Department, for operations, is increased
by $71,102 for payment of expenses related to  the development of affordable housing for low
income households funded with proceeds from bonds issued under the authority of Article
XI-Q of the Oregon Constitution for the Local Innovation and Fast  Track Housing Program.
SECTION 241. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the allocation  made to the
Housing and Community Services Department at the April 23, 2020, meeting of  the Emer-
gency Board (Item No. 1) is decreased by $12,000,000.
SECTION 242. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$12,000,000 is established for the biennium ending  June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts
and federal funds from the United States Department  of Housing and Urban Development for
contract services, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  this section,
collected or received by the Housing and Community Services Department, for  expenditure
of Coronavirus Relief Fund moneys received  by the Oregon Department of Administrative
Services and transferred to the Housing and  Community Services Department, for rental
assistance payments  and safe shelter alternatives for Oregonians who have been impacted
by income  loss due to COVID-19, or who are especially vulnerable to infection or health
problems associated with the virus because of inadequate housing or shelter.
SECTION 243.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of Veterans’ Affairs by section 1 (1), chapter 570, Oregon Laws
2019, for the biennium ending June  30, 2021, for services provided by the Department of
Veterans’ Affairs, is decreased by $637,854.
SECTION 244.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (1), chapter  570, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from lottery moneys
allocated from the Veterans’ Services  Fund established under ORS 406.140 to the Department
of Veterans’ Affairs for services provided by the Department of  Veterans’ Affairs, is de-
creased by $1,390,147.
SECTION 245. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (2), chapter  570, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from lottery moneys
allocated from the Veterans’ Services  Fund established under ORS 406.140 to the Department
of Veterans’ Affairs for payments  to counties pursuant to ORS 406.462, is decreased by
$358,325.
SECTION 246. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (3), chapter  570, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
Enrolled Senate Bill 5723 (SB 5723-INTRO) Page 26
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from lottery moneys
allocated from the Veterans’ Services  Fund established under ORS 406.140 to the Department
of Veterans’ Affairs for payments  to veterans’ service organizations pursuant to ORS
406.310, is decreased by $23,868.
SECTION 247. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the State Department of Agriculture by section 1  (1), chapter 452, Oregon
Laws 2019, for the biennium ending  June 30, 2021, for administrative and support services,
is decreased by $399,445.
SECTION 248. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (1), chapter  452, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, and  including federal funds for contract
services, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 452,
Oregon Laws 2019, collected or received by the State Department of  Agriculture, for admin-
istrative and support services, is increased by $199,445  to shift costs from the General Fund.
SECTION 249.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the State Department of Agriculture by section 1  (2), chapter 452, Oregon
Laws 2019, for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for food safety, is decreased by $866,785.
SECTION 250. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (2), chapter 452,  Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, and  including federal funds for contract
services, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 452,
Oregon Laws 2019, collected or received by  the State Department of Agriculture, for food
safety, is increased by $41,785 to shift costs from the General Fund.
SECTION 251.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 4 (2), chapter  452, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds other
than those described in section 2, chapter  452, Oregon Laws 2019, collected or received by the
State Department of Agriculture, for food safety, is  increased by $25,000 to shift costs from
the General Fund.
SECTION 252.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the State Department of Agriculture by section  5, chapter 654, Oregon Laws
2019, for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for work related to conducting preapplication
conferences relating to shellfish, is decreased by $163,049.
SECTION 253.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the State Department  of Agriculture by section 2, chapter 557, Oregon Laws
2019, for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for the purposes of enforcing and regulating
animal rescue entities, is decreased by $166,414.
SECTION 254.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the State Department of Agriculture by section 1  (3), chapter 452, Oregon
Laws 2019, for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for  natural resources, is decreased by
$622,570.
SECTION 255. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (3), chapter  452, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, and  including federal funds for contract
services, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 452,
Oregon Laws 2019, collected or received by the State  Department of Agriculture, for natural
resources, is increased by $192,234 to shift costs from the General Fund.
SECTION 256.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 4 (3), chapter  452, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
Enrolled Senate Bill 5723 (SB 5723-INTRO) Page 27
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds other
than those described in section 2, chapter  452, Oregon Laws 2019, collected or received by the
State Department  of Agriculture, for natural resources, is increased by $50,000 to shift costs
from the General Fund.
SECTION 257.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the State Department of Agriculture by section 16 (1), chapter  699, Oregon
Laws 2019, for the  biennium ending June 30, 2021, for the removal fill program, is decreased
by $21,339.
SECTION 258. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the State  Department of Agriculture by section 1 (4), chapter 452, Oregon
Laws 2019, for the  biennium ending June 30, 2021, for market access, is decreased by $282,872.
SECTION 259. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (4), chapter  452, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, and  including federal funds for contract
services, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 452,
Oregon Laws 2019, collected or received by the State Department  of Agriculture, for market
access, is decreased by $180,535.
SECTION 260.
In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the  Legislative Administration Committee, for the biennium ending June 30, 2021,
out of the General Fund, the amount of $1,350,000 for the Capitol Accessibility,  Maintenance
and Safety project.
SECTION 261. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (5), chapter  692, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by the Department of Justice, for  the Crime Victim and Survivor
Services Division, is increased by $2,000,000 for victims of domestic and sexual  violence due
to increasing needs resulting from the effects of the COVID-19 pandemic.
SECTION 262. (1) In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is ap-
propriated to  the Emergency Board, for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, out of the Gen-
eral Fund, the amount of $1,000,000, to be allocated to the Department of  Justice for Child
Advocacy Centers.
(2) If any of the moneys appropriated by subsection (1) of this section are not  allocated
by the Emergency Board prior to December 1, 2020, the moneys remaining on  that date be-
come available for any purpose for which the Emergency Board lawfully may allocate  funds.
SECTION 263. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the State Department of Energy by section 157, chapter 644, Oregon Laws 2019,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for the Rooftop  Solar Incentive Fund, is decreased by
$60,000.
SECTION 264.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 158, chapter 644, Oregon  Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the  maximum limit for payment of expenses by the State Depart-
ment of Energy from the Rooftop Solar Incentive Fund, is decreased by $60,000.
SECTION 265. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department  of Environmental Quality by section 1 (4), chapter 663, Oregon
Laws 2019, for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for agency  management, is decreased by
$83,487.
SECTION 266. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department  of Environmental Quality by section 1 (1), chapter 663, Oregon
Laws 2019, for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for air quality, is decreased by $1,573,065.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5723 (SB 5723-INTRO) Page 28
SECTION 267. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (1), chapter 663,  Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, the proceeds of bonds for the Orphan  Site
Account and federal funds from congestion mitigation  and air quality grants, drinking water
protection, beach bacteria monitoring, laboratory accreditation and woodstove grants and for
smoke monitoring laboratory services, but excluding  lottery funds and federal funds not de-
scribed in section 2, chapter 663, Oregon  Laws 2019, collected or received by the Department
of Environmental Quality,  for air quality, is increased by $100,000 to shift costs from the
General Fund for the Cleaner Air Oregon program.
SECTION 268. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department  of Environmental Quality by section 1 (3), chapter 663, Oregon
Laws 2019, for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for land quality, is decreased by $168,076.
SECTION 269. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (3), chapter  663, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, the proceeds of bonds for the Orphan  Site
Account and federal funds from congestion mitigation  and air quality grants, drinking water
protection, beach bacteria monitoring, laboratory accreditation and woodstove grants and for
smoke monitoring laboratory services, but excluding  lottery funds and federal funds not de-
scribed in section 2, chapter 663, Oregon  Laws 2019, collected or received by the Department
of Environmental Quality, for land quality, is increased by  $56,204 to shift costs from the
General Fund.
SECTION 270. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department  of Environmental Quality by section 1 (2), chapter 663, Oregon
Laws 2019, for the biennium  ending June 30, 2021, for water quality, is decreased by
$1,972,987.
SECTION 271. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (2), chapter 663,  Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, the proceeds of bonds for the Orphan  Site
Account and federal funds from congestion mitigation  and air quality grants, drinking water
protection, beach bacteria monitoring, laboratory accreditation and woodstove grants and for
smoke monitoring laboratory services, but excluding lottery funds  and federal funds not de-
scribed in section 2, chapter 663, Oregon  Laws 2019, collected or received by the Department
of Environmental Quality, for water quality, is increased by  $168,085 to shift costs from the
General Fund.
SECTION 272. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of Environmental Quality by section 23, chapter 645, Oregon
Laws 2019, for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for the clean diesel program,  is decreased
by $34,656.
SECTION 273.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the allocation  made to the
Department of Environmental Quality at the  March 9, 2020, meeting of the Emergency Board
(Item No. 10), to be used for rulemaking and other actions with the  goal of reducing
greenhouse gas emissions across all emissions sources, including point sources,  natural gas
emissions and transportation fuels, is decreased by $483,113.
SECTION 274. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (9), chapter  614, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received as reimburse-
ment from the United States Department of Transportation, but  excluding lottery funds and
federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 614, Oregon Laws 2019, collected or received
Enrolled Senate Bill 5723 (SB 5723-INTRO) Page 29
by the Department of Transportation, for driver and  motor vehicle services, is increased by
$2,741,953 for costs associated with the COVID-19 pandemic.
SECTION 275. This section intentionally left blank.
SECTION 276. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 6 (1), chapter 220,  Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as  the maximum limit for payment of expenses by the Department of
Education from  the Early Learning Account established by section 51, chapter 122, Oregon
Laws 2019, for professional development for early learning professionals, is  decreased by
$6,900,000.
SECTION 277. Notwithstanding any other  law limiting expenditures, the following
amounts are established for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, as the  maximum limit for
payment of grants-in-aid for the construction,  renovation and equipping of early learning and
child care  facilities by the Department of Education from the Early Learning Account es-
tablished by section 51, chapter 122, Oregon Laws 2019, for the following purposes:
(1) Port of Morrow for the
expansion of an early
learning center...................... $ 1,400,000
(2) YMCA of Columbia-Willamette
for the Beaverton Hoop YMCA
child development center ...... $ 2,500,000
(3) Rogue Valley Children’s
Discovery Experience............ $ 2,000,000
(4) Wallowa Valley Center for
Wellness and Winding
Waters Medical Clinic
for early childhood spaces
within the integrated
facility................................... $ 1,000,000
SECTION 278.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the allocation  made to the
Department of Human Services at the  April 23, 2020, meeting of the Emergency Board (Item
No. 6), for COVID-19 proactive testing and specialized  training for long term care workers,
is decreased by $3,350,000.
SECTION 279. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established at the August 5,  2020, meeting of the Emergency Board (Item No.
4), as the  maximum limit for payment of expenses by the Department of Human Services
from moneys from the Coronavirus Relief  Fund received by the Oregon Department of Ad-
ministrative Services and transferred to the Department of Human Services for Aging and
People with Disabilities and Intellectual/Development Disabilities, is  increased by $3,350,000
for COVID-19 proactive testing and specialized training for long term care workers.
SECTION 280.
Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the authorized appropriations
and expenditure limitations for the biennium ending June 30,  2021, for the Department of
Human Services, are changed by the amounts specified:
2019
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Central services and
state assessments and
enterprise-wide costs
General Fund Ch. 668 1(1) +556,303
Enrolled Senate Bill 5723 (SB 5723-INTRO) Page 30
Other funds Ch. 668 2(1) +208,442
Federal funds Ch. 668 3(1) -11,419,571
Self-sufficiency and
vocational rehabilitation
services
General Fund Ch. 668 1(2) -25,977,612
Other funds Ch. 668 2(2) +2,213,180
Federal funds Ch. 668 3(2) +19,417,672
Child welfare
General Fund Ch. 668 1(3) -9,321,347
Other funds Ch. 668 2(3) -13,723
Federal funds Ch. 668 3(3) +20,323,852
Aging and people
with disabilities and
intellectual/developmental
disabilities programs
General Fund Ch. 668 1(4) -172,206,421
Other funds Ch. 668 2(4) -5,319,514
Federal funds Ch. 668 3(4) +143,398,307
Shared services
Other funds Ch. 668 2(5) -1,331,902
SECTION 281.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the allocation  made to the
Oregon Health Authority at the March 9,  2020, meeting of the Emergency Board (Item No.
8), to support coronavirus emergency response activities, is decreased by $4,000,000.
SECTION 282. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$4,000,000 is established for the  biennium ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
tobacco tax receipts, recreational marijuana tax receipts,  provider taxes, Medicare receipts
and federal funds for  indirect cost recovery, Supplemental Security Income recoveries,
Women,  Infants  and Children Program food rebates, the Coordinated School Health Program,
the Edward Byrne Memorial State and Local  Law Enforcement Assistance Grant Program
and emergency preparedness and response services, but excluding  lottery funds and federal
funds not described in this section, collected or received by the  Oregon Health Authority, for
expenditure of Coronavirus Relief Fund moneys received by the Oregon Department  of Ad-
ministrative Services and transferred to the Oregon Health Authority for coronavirus
emergency response activities.
SECTION 283.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Corrections by section 16, chapter 644, Oregon Laws 2019,
for the biennium ending  June 30, 2021, for the Corrections Information Tool System Upgrade
project, is decreased by $140,250.
SECTION 284. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department  of Corrections by section 1 (2), chapter 688, Oregon Laws 2019,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for central administration  and administrative ser-
vices, is decreased by $2,198,782.
SECTION 285. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (3), chapter 688,  Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or received  by the Department of Corrections, for offender management and
rehabilitation, is  increased by $315,000, for expenditure of Coronavirus Relief Funds received
Enrolled Senate Bill 5723 (SB 5723-INTRO) Page 31
by the Oregon Department  of Administrative Services and transferred to the Department
of Corrections for transportation expenses.
SECTION 286. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (4), chapter 688,  Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or received by  the Department of Corrections, for community corrections,
is increased by $388,045, for expenditure of  a Coronavirus Emergency Supplemental Funding
grant from the Criminal Justice Commission.
SECTION 287. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Criminal Justice  Commission by section 1, chapter 520, Oregon
Laws 2019, for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, is decreased by $668,000.
SECTION 288. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 4, chapter 520, Oregon Laws  2019, for the biennium end-
ing June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds collected
or received by the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission, is increased  by $6,811,383, for ex-
penditure of Coronavirus Emergency Supplemental Funding received from the United States
Department of Justice, Bureau  of Justice Assistance Edward Byrne Memorial Justice As-
sistance Grant Program authorized  by the Coronavirus Aid, Relief and Economic Security
Act of 2020.
SECTION 289.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the allocation made to the
Department of Justice at the  April 23, 2020, meeting of the Emergency Board (Item No. 3),
for victims of  domestic and sexual violence due to increasing needs resulting from the effects
of the COVID-19 pandemic, is decreased by $2,000,000.
SECTION 290. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Military Department by  section 1 (3), chapter 534, Oregon Laws
2019, for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for emergency  management, is decreased by
$100,000.
SECTION 291. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Military Department by  section 1 (3), chapter 534, Oregon Laws
2019, for the biennium ending  June 30, 2021, for emergency management, is decreased by
$681,022.
SECTION 292. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 3 (2), chapter  534, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30,  2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds
collected or  received by the Oregon Military Department, other than those described in sec-
tion 2, chapter 534, Oregon Laws 2019, for emergency management, is decreased by  $681,022.
SECTION 293. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Military Department by  section 1 (2), chapter 534, Oregon Laws
2019, for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for operations, is decreased by $682,747.
SECTION 294. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 3 (1), chapter  534, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30,  2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds
collected or  received by the Oregon Military Department, other than those described in sec-
tion 2, chapter 534, Oregon Laws 2019, for operations, is decreased by $964,664.
SECTION 295. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the allocation made to the
Oregon Military Department at the March 9,  2020, meeting of the Emergency Board (Item
No. 9), for an all-hazard emergency preparedness and response program, is decreased  by
$500,000.
SECTION 296. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (3), chapter 534,  Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, for emergency management, as the maximum limit for payment of ex-
Enrolled Senate Bill 5723 (SB 5723-INTRO) Page 32
penses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and re-
imbursements from federal service  agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds
not described in section 2, chapter 534, Oregon Laws 2019, collected  or received by the
Oregon Military Department, is increased by $500,000 for expenditure of Coronavirus  Relief
Funds received by the  Oregon Department of Administrative Services and transferred to the
Oregon Military Department for emergency preparedness and response.
SECTION 297.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of State Police by section 1 (1), chapter 568, Oregon Laws 2019,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for patrol services, criminal investigations, gaming
enforcement and the office of the State Fire Marshal, is decreased by $889,128.
SECTION 298.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of State Police by section 1 (4), chapter 568, Oregon Laws 2019,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for  administrative services, agency support and
criminal justice information services, is decreased by $3,645,607.
SECTION 299.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of State Police by section 1 (3), chapter 568, Oregon Laws 2019,
for the biennium ending June 30,  2021, for forensic services and the Chief Medical Examiner,
is decreased by $2,400,000.
SECTION 300.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (1), chapter 568,  Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or received by the Department of State Police, for patrol  services, criminal
investigations, gaming enforcement and the office of the State Fire Marshal, is  increased by
$107,676 for expenditure of a Coronavirus Emergency Supplemental Funding grant  from the
Criminal Justice Commission.
SECTION 301. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of State Police by section 1 (1), chapter 568, Oregon Laws 2019,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for patrol services, criminal investigations, gaming
enforcement and the office of the State Fire Marshal, is decreased by $56,000,000.
SECTION 302.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (1), chapter 568,  Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or received by the Department of State Police, for patrol  services, criminal
investigations, gaming enforcement and the office of the State Fire Marshal, is  increased by
$56,000,000 for expenditure of Coronavirus Relief Funds received by the  Oregon Department
of Administrative  Services and transferred to the Department of State Police for personnel
expenses in the Patrol Division from March 2020 through December 2020.
SECTION 303. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (1), chapter  479, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by the Department of  Public Safety Standards and Training, for
operations, is increased by $22,728, for  expenditure of a Coronavirus Emergency Supple-
mental Funding grant from the Criminal Justice Commission.
SECTION 304. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Youth Authority by section 1 (1), chapter 427,  Oregon Laws 2019,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for operations, is decreased by $9,097,837.
SECTION 305. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2, chapter  427, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium end-
ing June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees,  moneys or other
Enrolled Senate Bill 5723 (SB 5723-INTRO) Page 33
revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds,
collected or received by the Oregon Youth Authority, is decreased by $368,547.
SECTION 306.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 3, chapter 427, Oregon Laws  2019, for the biennium end-
ing June 30, 2021, as the maximum limits  for payment of expenses from federal funds col-
lected or received by the Oregon Youth Authority, is decreased by $4,323,088.
SECTION 307. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Youth Authority by section 1 (3), chapter 427,  Oregon Laws 2019,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for Multnomah County gang  services, is decreased by
$313,480.
SECTION 308. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Youth Authority by section 1 (4), chapter 427,  Oregon Laws 2019,
for the biennium  ending June 30, 2021, for the East Metro Gang Enforcement Team, is de-
creased by $1,002,167.
SECTION 309. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2, chapter 427, Oregon Laws  2019, for the biennium end-
ing June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees,  moneys or other
revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds,
collected or received by the Oregon Youth Authority, is increased by $350,000, for  expendi-
ture of a Coronavirus Emergency Supplemental Funding grant  from the Criminal Justice
Commission.
SECTION 310.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the allocation made to the
Oregon Business Development Department  at the April 23, 2020, meeting of the Emergency
Board (Item No. 2), for business, innovation and  trade, to provide financial assistance to
small businesses affected by economic conditions  associated with the COVID-19 pandemic
that have  not received federal emergency assistance under the federal CARES Act or any
subsequent federal act that provides emergency pandemic funding, is  decreased by $2,200,000.
SECTION 311. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for the biennium ending  June
30, 2021, out of the General Fund, the amount of $250,000, for special governmental payments,
for the purpose of contracting with  an independent economist to examine wildfire protection
costs and funding in Oregon.
SECTION 312. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to  the Higher Education Coordinating Commission by section 1 (9), chapter 666,
Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium ending June  30, 2021, for public university statewide
programs, is increased by $500,000 for the University of  Oregon to purchase a new research
vessel for the Oregon Institute of Marine Biology.
SECTION 313. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the State  Department of Fish and Wildlife by section 1 (1), chapter 689, Oregon
Laws 2019, for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for the Fish Division, is decreased by
$1,409,626.
SECTION 314.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (1), chapter  689, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, and including federal funds  from the
Pacific Coastal Salmon Recovery Fund, but  excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in section 2, chapter 689, Oregon Laws  2019, collected or received by the State
Department of Fish and Wildlife, for the Fish Division, is  increased by $35,721 to shift costs
from the General Fund.
SECTION 315. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 4 (1), chapter 689,  Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds other
Enrolled Senate Bill 5723 (SB 5723-INTRO) Page 34
than those described in section 2, chapter  689, Oregon Laws 2019, collected or received by the
State Department of Fish  and Wildlife, for the Fish Division, is increased by $213,744 to shift
costs from the General Fund.
SECTION 316. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the State  Department of Fish and Wildlife by section 1 (2), chapter 689, Oregon
Laws 2019, for the biennium ending June 30, 2021,  for the Wildlife Division, is decreased by
$559,814.
SECTION 317. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 4 (2), chapter 689,  Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds other
than those described in section 2, chapter  689, Oregon Laws 2019, collected or received by the
State Department of Fish and Wildlife, for  the Wildlife Division, is increased by $204,350 to
shift costs from the General Fund.
SECTION 318.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the State Department of Fish and Wildlife by  section 7, chapter 654, Oregon
Laws 2019, for the biennium ending June 30, 2021,  for administration and enforcement of
section 6, chapter 654, Oregon Laws 2019, is decreased by $160,000.
SECTION 319. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the State Department of Fish  and Wildlife by section 16 (2), chapter 699,
Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium ending June  30, 2021, for activities related to removal-fill
laws, is decreased by $17,207.
SECTION 320. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the State  Department of Fish and Wildlife by section 1 (3), chapter 689, Oregon
Laws 2019, for the biennium ending June 30, 2021,  for the Administrative Services Division,
is decreased by $1,296,653.
SECTION 321. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the State  Department of Fish and Wildlife by section 1 (5), chapter 689, Oregon
Laws 2019, for the biennium ending June 30,  2021, for capital improvement, is decreased by
$150,669.
SECTION 322. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the State  Department of Fish and Wildlife by section 1 (6), chapter 689, Oregon
Laws 2019, for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for  State Police enforcement, is decreased
by $276,094.
SECTION 323. Notwithstanding any other  law limiting expenditures, the following
amounts are established for the biennium ending June 30, 2021,  as the maximum limits for
payment of grants-in-aid, program costs and purchased services from  federal funds, other
than those described in sections 8 and 10, chapter 609, Oregon Laws 2019, received by  the
Department of Education, for the following purposes:
(1) K-12 programs ........................... $121,843,573
(2) Early learning programs ........... $ 16,291,011
SECTION 324. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount  of
$1,610,000 is established for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, as  the maximum limit for
payment of grants-in-aid, program costs and purchased services from moneys  from the
Coronavirus Relief Fund received by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services and
transferred to the Department of Education.
SECTION 325. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount  of
$10,000,000 is established for the biennium ending June 30,  2021, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from  moneys from the Governor’s Education Emergency Relief Fund
received by the Oregon Department of  Administrative Services and transferred to the Higher
Education Coordinating Commission.
SECTION 326. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department  of Corrections by section 1 (1), chapter 688, Oregon Laws 2019,
Enrolled Senate Bill 5723 (SB 5723-INTRO) Page 35
for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for operations and  health services, is increased by
$23,776,935.
SECTION 327. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department  of Corrections by section 1 (3), chapter 688, Oregon Laws 2019,
for the biennium ending  June 30, 2021, for offender management and rehabilitation, is in-
creased by $1,097,260.
SECTION 328. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department  of Corrections by section 1 (4), chapter 688, Oregon Laws 2019,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for community corrections, is increased by $612,439.
SECTION 329. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Judicial Department by  section 1 (2), chapter 691, Oregon Laws 2019, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for operations, is decreased by $9,700,000.
SECTION 330. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Judicial Department by  section 1 (3), chapter 691, Oregon Laws 2019, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for mandated payments, is decreased by $500,000.
SECTION 331. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Judicial Department by  section 7 (1), chapter 691, Oregon Laws 2019, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for law libraries, is decreased by $900,000.
SECTION 332. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (1), chapter  691, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and including reimbursements from federal
service agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section
2, chapter 691, Oregon Laws 2019, collected or received by  the Judicial Department, is in-
creased by $2,450,000 for various grants and agreements.
SECTION 333.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Public Defense Services Commission by section 1 (1),  chapter 303, Oregon
Laws 2019, for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for the Appellate  Division, is decreased by
$1,183,707.
SECTION 334. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Public Defense Services Commission by section 1 (2),  chapter 303, Oregon
Laws 2019, for the biennium  ending June 30, 2021, for professional services, is decreased by
$174,506.
SECTION 335. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Public Defense Services Commission by section 1 (3), chapter 303, Oregon
Laws 2019, for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for  the contract and business services di-
vision, is decreased by $538,599.
SECTION 336. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for the biennium ending  June
30, 2021, out of the General Fund, the amount of $1,500,000, for special governmental pay-
ments, for Wallowa Valley  Center for Wellness and Winding Waters Medical Clinic to build
an integrated health services facility in Enterprise.
SECTION 337.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 116 (13), chapter 644, Oregon Laws 2019,  for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as  the maximum limit for payment of expenses from lottery bond pro-
ceeds collected or received by the Oregon  Department of Administrative Services, for the
Hacienda CDC, Las Adelitas Housing Project, is decreased by $2,042,875.
SECTION 338. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 116 (15), chapter 644, Oregon Laws 2019,  for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses  from lottery bond pro-
ceeds collected or received by the Oregon  Department of Administrative Services, for the
Port of Morrow, Early Learning Center Expansion, is decreased by $1,439,188.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5723 (SB 5723-INTRO) Page 36
SECTION 339. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 116 (8), chapter 644, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as  the maximum limit for payment of expenses from lottery bond pro-
ceeds collected or received by the Oregon  Department of Administrative Services, for the
Wallowa Valley Center for Wellness, is decreased by $2,548,087.
SECTION 340.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 116 (4), chapter 644, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses  from lottery bond pro-
ceeds collected or received by the Oregon  Department of Administrative Services, for the
YMCA of Columbia-Willamette, Beaverton Hoop YMCA, is decreased by $2,558,500.
SECTION 341.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 59, chapter 355, Oregon Laws 2019,  for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from the Employer  In-
centive Fund established under section  1, chapter 105, Oregon Laws 2018, by the Public Em-
ployees Retirement Board, is decreased by $35,248,198.
SECTION 342. (1) In addition to and not in lieu  of any other appropriation, there is ap-
propriated to the Emergency Board, for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, out of the  Gen-
eral Fund, the amount of $100,000,000, to be allocated to  the Oregon Health Authority or the
Department of Human  Services for caseload costs or other budget challenges that the agency
is unable to mitigate.
(2) If any of the moneys appropriated by subsection (1) of this section are not  allocated
by the Emergency Board prior to December 1, 2020, the moneys remaining on  that date be-
come available for any purpose for which the Emergency Board lawfully may allocate  funds.
SECTION 343. In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the  Housing and Community Services Department, for the biennium ending June
30, 2021, out of the General Fund, the amount of  $2,000,000, for administration and matching
funds for Individual Development Accounts.
SECTION 344. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Public Defense Services Commission by section 1 (2), chapter 303, Oregon
Laws 2019, for the biennium ending  June 30, 2021, for professional services, is increased by
$200,000 for training public defense attorneys participating in the Parent Child Represen-
tation program.
SECTION 345.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Commission for  the Blind by section 1, chapter 519, Oregon Laws 2019, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for operations of the commission, is decreased by $468,426.
SECTION 346. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Emergency Board by section 1, chapter 644, Oregon  Laws 2019, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2021, for the purposes for which the Emergency Board lawfully
may allocate funds, is increased by $200,000,000.
SECTION 347.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount  of
$400,000,000 is established for the biennium ending  June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the Department of Education from  lottery moneys transferred from
the Education Stability Fund to the State School Fund.
SECTION 348. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon  Health Authority by section 1 (3), chapter 695, Oregon Laws 2019,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for  central services, state assessments and
enterprise-wide costs, is decreased by $3,401,972.
SECTION 349. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 4, chapter 665, Oregon Laws  2019, for the biennium end-
ing June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees,  moneys or other
revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds,
collected or received by the Office of the Governor, is increased by $162,000.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5723 (SB 5723-INTRO) Page 37
SECTION 350. Notwithstanding any other  law limiting expenditures, the amount estab-
lished by section 93, chapter 644,  Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium ending June 30, 2021,
as the maximum limit  for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, in-
cluding Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds from  the United States Department of
Housing and Urban  Development for contract services, but excluding lottery funds and fed-
eral funds not described in section 93, chapter 644, Oregon Laws  2019, collected or received
by the Housing and Community Services Department, for the TANF Housing Pilot  Program
created under section 1, chapter 574, Oregon Laws 2019, is decreased by $10,365,000.
SECTION 351. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 4, chapter  218, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium end-
ing June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses by the Department of Ed-
ucation from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous  Receipts, but
excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Department of  Edu-
cation for the State  School Fund from the Fund for Student Success established by ORS
327.001, is decreased by $50,130,000.
SECTION 352. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 52, chapter 644, Oregon Laws 2019,  for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses by  the Judicial De-
partment from the Oregon Courthouse Capital Construction and  Improvement Fund for the
project costs of, and cost of issuing general obligation bonds  for, county courthouse projects,
is decreased by $104,635,000.
SECTION 353. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section  2 (13), chapter 614, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received as reimburse-
ment from the United States Department of Transportation, but  excluding lottery funds and
federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 614, Oregon Laws 2019, collected or received
by the Department of Transportation, for rail, is decreased by $5,106,587.
SECTION 354. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the authorized appropriations
and expenditure limitations for the biennium  ending June 30, 2021, for the following agencies
and programs are changed by the amounts specified:
(1) ADMINISTRATION.
2019
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Oregon Department of
Administrative Services:
Debt Service
General Fund Ch. 518 1(6) -331,120
Debt Service - ODAS
Other funds Ch. 518 2(12) -2,292,885
Debt Service and Related
Costs for Bonds Issued
Lottery funds Ch. 518 3 -288,354
State Treasury:
Enrolled Senate Bill 5723 (SB 5723-INTRO) Page 38
Administrative Expenses
- Operations
Other funds Ch. 673 1(1) -5,377
Administrative Expenses
- Oregon 529 Savings Network
Other funds Ch. 673 1(2) -337
Administrative Expenses
- Oregon Retirement
Savings Board
Other funds Ch. 673 1(3) +5,714
Secretary of State:
Administrative Services
Division
Other funds Ch. 672 2(1) +66,963
Archives Division
Other funds Ch. 672 2(4) +162,430
Corporation Division
Other funds Ch. 672 2(5) +64,890
Department of Revenue:
Debt Service
General Fund Ch. 612 1(8) -692,726
Other funds Ch. 612 2(11) +690,641
Oregon Government Ethics
Commission:
Operating Expenses
Other funds Ch. 35 1 +61,392
(2) CONSUMER AND BUSINESS SERVICES.
2019
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Oregon Board of Accountancy:
Operating Expenses
Other funds Ch. 38 1 +28,101
Construction Contractors
Board:
Operating Expenses
Other funds Ch. 34 1 +775,000
Mental Health Regulatory
Agency
Oregon Board of Licensed
Professional Counselors
and Therapists:
Other funds Ch. 23 1 +56,243
Oregon Board of Psychology:
Other funds Ch. 23 2 +80,780
State Board of Licensed
Enrolled Senate Bill 5723 (SB 5723-INTRO) Page 39
Social Workers:
Operating Expenses
Other funds Ch. 22 1 -15,654
Health-Related Licensing
Boards:
Occupational Therapy
Licensing Board
Other funds Ch. 25 3 -7,134
Board of Medical Imaging
Other funds Ch. 25 4 +1,409
State Board of Examiners
for Speech-Language
Pathology and Audiology
Other funds Ch. 25 5 -25,527
Oregon State Veterinary
Medical Examining Board
Other funds Ch. 25 6 +16,650
Department of Consumer and
Business Services:
Division of Financial
Regulation
Federal funds Ch. 607 5(5) +11,845,226
Building Codes Division
Other funds Ch. 607 1(6) -11,845,226
Real Estate Agency:
Operating Expenses
Other funds Ch. 29 1 +899,415
State Board of Pharmacy:
Operating Expenses
Other funds Ch. 27 1 -25,774
(3) ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT.
2019
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Oregon Business Development
Department:
Debt Service
General Fund Ch. 522 1(3) -1,701,570
Other funds Ch. 644 34 +2,578,426
Lottery Bond Debt Service
Lottery funds Ch. 522 3(4) -2,542,922
Housing and Community
Services Department:
Debt Service
General Fund Ch. 642 5 -5,526,530
Other funds Ch. 642 5a +37,102
Enrolled Senate Bill 5723 (SB 5723-INTRO) Page 40
Lottery funds Ch. 642 3 -37,101
Department of Veterans’
Affairs:
Services Provided by
the Department
Lottery funds Ch. 570 2(1) +213,860
Debt Service
General Fund Ch. 570 1(4) -19,846
(4) EDUCATION.
2019
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Department of Education:
Article XI-P General
Obligation Bonds Debt
Service
General Fund Ch. 609 4 -19,501
Other funds Ch. 609 6(4) +19,515
Higher Education
Coordinating Commission:
Debt Service - XI-G Bonds
Community Colleges
General Fund Ch. 666
1(16)(a) -1,573,977
Debt Service - XI-G Bonds
Public Universities
General Fund Ch. 666
1(16)(c) -4,431,089
Debt Service - XI-G Bonds
Oregon Health and Science
University
General Fund Ch. 666
1(16)(d) -420
Debt Service - XI-Q Public
Universities
General Fund Ch. 666
1(16)(e) -5,643,346
Operations
Other funds Ch. 666 6(1) +262,548
Debt Service - Lottery,
XI-G and XI-Q Bonds
Public Universities
Other funds Ch. 666 6(4) +8,211,001
Debt Service - Lottery,
XI-G Bonds Community
Colleges
Enrolled Senate Bill 5723 (SB 5723-INTRO) Page 41
Other funds Ch. 666 6(5) +714,173
Debt Service - XI-G bonds
Oregon Health and Science
University
Other funds Ch. 666 6(6) +421
Western Oregon Timber
Severance Tax Fund and
the Eastern Oregon Timber
Severance Tax Fund for the
Community College Support
Fund
Other funds Ch. 666 8 +22,783
(5) HUMAN SERVICES.
2019
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Commission for the Blind:
Operating Expenses
General Fund Ch. 519 1 +52,929
Department of Human
Services:
Capital debt service
and related costs
General Fund Ch. 644 106 -1,363,570
Oregon Health Authority:
Debt Service
General Fund Ch. 695 1(5) -3,697,749
Other funds Ch. 644 99 +8,550
(6) JUDICIAL BRANCH.
2019
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Judicial Department:
Debt Service
General Fund Ch. 691 1(5) -8,110,599
Other funds Ch. 644 53 +8,132,005
(7) LEGISLATIVE BRANCH.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5723 (SB 5723-INTRO) Page 42
2019
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Legislative Administration
Committee:
Debt Service
General Fund Ch. 693 1(2) +4,596,228
General Fund Ch. 644 56(2) -99,990
Other funds Ch. 693 2(2) -4,801,440
(8) NATURAL RESOURCES.
2019
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
State Marine Board:
Administration and
Education
Other funds Ch. 301 1(1) -8,639
Marine Law Enforcement
Other funds Ch. 301 1(2) +8,639
State Department of Energy:
Operations
Other funds Ch. 698 2 +41,992
State Parks and Recreation
Department:
Director’s Office
Other funds Ch. 302 1(1) -3,330
Lottery funds Ch. 302 2(1) -3,171
Central Services
Other funds Ch. 302 1(2) +3,330
Lottery funds Ch. 302 2(2) +3,171
Water Resources Department:
Water Rights and
Adjudications
Federal funds Ch. 535 4(3) +526
Technical Services
General Fund Ch. 535 1(4) -187,396
Federal funds Ch. 535 4(4) -526
Director’s Office
General Fund Ch. 535 1(5) +187,396
Debt Service
Other funds Ch. 644 80 +3,309
Lottery funds Ch. 535 2 -3,308
Department of Environmental
Enrolled Senate Bill 5723 (SB 5723-INTRO) Page 43
Quality:
Debt Service
General Fund Ch. 663 1(5) -155,927
State Department of
Fish and Wildlife:
Major Construction and
Acquisition
Other funds Ch. 689 2(7) -257,448
State Forestry Department:
Debt Service
General Fund Ch. 664 1(4) -71,373
Other funds Ch. 664 2(6) -65,540
(9) PUBLIC SAFETY.
2019
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Department of State Police:
Administrative Services,
Agency Support and Criminal
Justice Information Services
General Fund Ch. 568 1(4) -356,360
Other funds Ch. 568 2(4) -148,840
Department of Corrections:
Debt Service
General Fund Ch. 688 1(5) -4,205,570
Other funds Ch. 644 17 +14,980
Department of Justice:
Office of the Attorney
General and Administration
General Fund Ch. 692 1(1) +30,028
Other funds Ch. 692 2(1) -30,028
Criminal Justice Division
Federal funds Ch. 692 3(2) +12,905
Crime Victim and Survivor
Services Division
Federal funds Ch. 692 3(3) +153,386
Division of Child Support
General Fund Ch. 692 1(6) +60
Federal funds Ch. 692 3(4) -166,269
Child Support Enforcement
Automated System
Other funds Ch. 692 2(9) +470,287
Federal funds Ch. 692 3(5) +900,098
Civil Enforcement Division
Federal funds Ch. 692 3(1) -6,622
General Counsel Division
Enrolled Senate Bill 5723 (SB 5723-INTRO) Page 44
Other funds Ch. 692 2(6) +158,244
Trial Division
Other funds Ch. 692 2(7) -151,041
Oregon Military Department:
Debt Service
General Fund Ch. 534 1(5) -286,073
Other funds Ch. 534 2(5) +157,866
Department of Public
Safety Standards and
Training:
Debt service
General Fund Ch. 479 1 -307,401
Oregon Youth Authority:
Debt Service
General Fund Ch. 427 1(5) -863,768
Other funds Ch. 644 18 +313,100
(10) TRANSPORTATION.
2019
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Oregon Department of
Aviation:
Operations
Other funds Ch. 115 1(1) +19,933
Department of
Transportation:
Debt Service
General Fund Ch. 614 1 -129,687
Other funds Ch. 614 2(16) +921,900
Lottery funds Ch. 614 4 -921,619
SECTION 355. This 2020 second special  session Act being necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to  exist, and
this 2020 second special session Act takes effect on its passage.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5723 (SB 5723-INTRO) Page 45
Passed by Senate August 10, 2020
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House August 10, 2020
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2020
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2020
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2020
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5723 (SB 5723-INTRO) Page 46